Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 2. Aviation Advisory Board.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 18, SLA 2005 (SB 133), adding AS

44.42.200

—

44.42.290

, see 2005 Senate Journal 507 — 508.

Sec. 44.42.200.
Aviation Advisory Board.

The Aviation Advisory Board is established in the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.42.210.
Purpose of the board.

The purpose of the board is to advise and provide recommendations to the commissioner on public policy related to the department’s exercise of its aviation functions assigned by law.

Before filling, on a permanent basis, the position of chief administrative officer of the Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport or the Fairbanks International Airport, the commissioner shall consult with the board concerning candidates to fill the position.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.42.220.
Meetings; hearings; records.

The board shall meet at least once each year as requested by the commissioner, or more frequently as determined appropriate by the chair of the board, to carry out its advisory functions. The board may hold public hearings and use other means to solicit information from the public and other interested persons necessary to carry out its advisory functions. Meetings of the board are subject to AS AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act).

Records of the board are subject to AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.120

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.319

(Open Meetings Act)” was substituted for “AS

44.62.310

—

44.62.312

” in accordance with § 29(2), ch. 58, SLA 2010.

Sec. 44.42.230.
Composition of the board.

The Aviation Advisory Board consists of the following 11 members, who are appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor:

a member who represents a statewide trade association of air carriers doing business in diverse regions of the state and serving both rural and international airports;

a member who represents a statewide membership organization of pilots, aircraft owners, and other aviation supporters, organized to promote noncommercial aviation in the state;

a member who represents air carriers signatory to the Alaska international airport system operating agreement;

a member who owns or is employed by a regional air carrier in the state;

a member who is a community leader residing in the unorganized borough of the state;

a member who represents the mayor of the Municipality of Anchorage;

a member who jointly represents the mayors of the City of Fairbanks and the Fairbanks North Star Borough;

a member who represents the tenants of the Alaska international airport system, but does not represent an air carrier;

a member who represents an air carrier engaged exclusively in the air cargo business in the state; and

two members who represent other interests that the governor determines appropriate to advise on aviation activities in the state.

To provide geographic balance on the board, the governor shall appoint at least one member from each of the four judicial districts of the state.

The governor shall designate a member of the board to serve as chair of the board, or, at the governor’s request, the board shall elect a chair from among its members who are not state officers or employees.

Members of the board are appointed for staggered three-year terms and serve until a successor is appointed. A member appointed to fill a vacancy on the board serves for the remainder of the unexpired term of the member whose vacancy is being filled.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.42.240.
Compensation, transportation expenses, and per diem.

Board members receive no compensation as members of the board. Board members who are not state officers or employees are entitled to transportation expenses and per diem as provided in AS

39.20.180

for members of state boards and commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.42.290.
Definitions.

In AS

44.42.200

—

44.42.290

,

“Alaska international airport system” means the Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport and the Fairbanks International Airport;

“board” means the Aviation Advisory Board established in AS

44.42.200

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 2005)